Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1052.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 4. A person that solicits, offers, or receives a kickback or bribe in connection with the furnishing of goods or services for which payment is or may be made in whole or in part under a program established under the social welfare act, 280 PA 1939, MCL 400.1 to 400.119b, makes or receives the payment, or receives a rebate of a fee or charge for referring an individual to another person for the furnishing of the goods and services is guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment for not more than 4 years, or by a fine of not more than $30,000.00, or both. Model arrangements and model patient incentives, as authorized and sponsored by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, do not constitute a kickback or bribe under this section. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor